Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-748.13
Record in original language; English translation.

A record filed with a tribunal of this state under sections 42-748.01 to 42-748.13 must be in the original language and, if not in English, must be accompanied by an English translation.

Laws 2015, LB415, § 60.